Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-207
Library board; funds; buildings; custody and control.

The library board shall have exclusive control of expenditures, of all money collected or donated to the credit of the library fund, of the renting and construction of any library building, and the supervision, care and custody of the grounds, rooms or buildings constructed, leased or set apart for that purpose.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 4, p. 315;

R.S.1913, § 3795;

C.S.1922, § 3188;

Laws 1923, c. 148, § 1, p. 363;

Laws 1925, c. 38, § 1, p. 149;

C.S.1929, § 51-204;

Laws 1941, c. 103, § 1, p. 421;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-204;

R.S.1943, § 51-207.